Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 10. Dissolution

Cross references. —

As to dissolution of public irrigation and power districts, see §

41-7-817

.

As to dissolution of drainage districts, see §§

41-9-601

through

41-9-606

.

§ 41-7-1001.
Petition of landowners.

When the commissioners of an irrigation district by unanimous vote of the total membership thereof shall determine to call an election or whenever a majority of the landowners in any irrigation district in this state, who shall represent one-half of the irrigable lands within such district, shall file with the commissioners of such district a petition praying for the dissolution thereof, it shall be the duty of the commissioners of such district to forthwith call an election of all the landowners of said district to determine whether or not such district shall be dissolved.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-751; Laws 1933, ch. 2, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1101; W.S. 1957, § 41-349.

§ 41-7-1002.
Election; notice.

Notice of such election shall be published for four (4) successive weeks in one (1) or more newspapers published in each county in which such district is situated, stating the time and place of said meeting and the object thereof, and in addition thereto, the commissioners of the district shall give the same notice as is required in case of annual elections in irrigation districts.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-752; C.S. 1945, § 71-1102; W.S. 1957, § 41-350.

§ 41-7-1003.
Election; conduct; certification of result; report of district indebtedness.

If at any such election which shall be conducted in the same manner as is now provided by law for the conduct of annual elections in irrigation districts, a majority of all the qualified votes in the district shall be in favor of the dissolution of such district, the commissioners of such district shall forthwith certify to the district court having jurisdiction of such district the result of such election, and at the same time shall report to the court the amount and character of the then existing indebtedness of the district. In the event the question of the dissolution of such district does not carry at such election the question shall not again be raised for a period of one (1) year.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-753; C.S. 1945, § 71-1103; W.S. 1957, § 41-351.

§ 41-7-1004.
Order for hearing on results of election; generally.

Upon the filing of the commissioner’s report and return of election, an order shall be made and entered by the court fixing the time and place for a hearing thereon, at which time and place all creditors and other persons interested may appear and show cause why said district should not be dissolved.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-754; C.S. 1945, § 71-1104; W.S. 1957, § 41-352.

§ 41-7-1005.
Order for hearing on results of election; publication.

A copy of such order to show cause shall be published for four (4) successive weeks prior to said hearing in a newspaper published in each county in which said district is situated.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-755; C.S. 1945, § 71-1105; W.S. 1957, § 41-353.

§ 41-7-1006.
Hearings; final settlement.

Upon said hearing, the court must find, on the evidence submitted, if the district be ordered dissolved, that the best interests of all parties interested will be served by the proposed dissolution, and shall determine the amount of the existing indebtedness of such district, if any, and shall make an order requiring the payment of the same. Upon the filing by the commissioners of proper receipts, showing payment of all indebtedness against the district, the court shall thereupon make a final order dissolving such district, and in said order the court may provide for a receiver who shall have full authority to collect and distribute any assets of property formerly belonging to said district, and who shall be guided by and shall comply with the provisions of W.S.

1-33-101

through

1-33-110

, in the performance of his duties.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 54, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-756; Laws 1933, ch. 14, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 71-1106; W.S. 1957, § 41-354.